Hawaii statutes.
§269-9 Report accidents. Every public
utility shall report to the public utilities commission all accidents caused by
or occurring in connection with its operations and service, and the commission
shall investigate the causes of any accident which results in loss of life, and
may investigate any other accidents which in its opinion require investigation.
[L 1913, c 89, §7; RL 1925, §2195; RL 1935, §7947; RL 1945, §4708; RL 1955,
§104-8; HRS §269-9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next